Utah statutes.
72-2-124.   Transportation Investment Fund of 2005.
(1)  There is created a special revenue fund entitled the Transportation
Investment Fund of 2005.
(2)  The fund consists of monies generated from the following sources:
(a)  any voluntary contributions received for the maintenance, construction,
reconstruction, or renovation of state and federal highways;
(b)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature;
(c)  the sales and use tax revenues deposited into the fund in accordance with
Section 59-12-103; and
(d)  registration fees designated under Subsection 41-1a-1201(7).
(3)  When the highway general obligation bonds have been paid off and the
highway projects completed that are intended to be paid from revenues
deposited in the Centennial Highway Fund Restricted Account as determined by
the Executive Appropriations Committee under Subsection 72-2-118(6)(d), the
fund shall also consist of monies generated from the following sources:
(a)  registration fees designated under Subsection 41-1a-1201(6)(a); and
(b)  the sales and use tax amounts provided for in Section 59-12-103.
(4) (a)  The fund shall earn interest.
(b)  All interest earned on fund monies shall be deposited into the fund.
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), the executive director may
use fund monies only to pay:
(i)  the costs of maintenance, construction, reconstruction, or renovation to
state and federal highways prioritized by the Transportation Commission
through the prioritization process for new transportation capacity projects
adopted under Section 72-1-304;
(ii)  the costs of maintenance, construction, reconstruction, or renovation to
the highway projects described in Subsection 63B-18-401(2); and
(iii)  principal, interest, and issuance costs of bonds authorized by Section
63B-18-401.
(b)  The executive director may use fund monies to exchange for an equal or
greater amount of federal transportation funds to be used as provided in
Subsection (5)(a).
(6) (a)  Before bonds authorized by Section 63B-18-401 may be issued in any
fiscal year, the department and the commission shall appear before the
Executive Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and present the amount
of bond proceeds that the department needs to provide funding for the projects
identified in Subsection 63B-18-401(2) for the next fiscal year.
(b)  The Executive Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall review
and comment on the amount of bond proceeds needed to fund the projects.
(7)  The Division of Finance shall, from monies deposited into the fund,
transfer the amount of funds necessary to pay principal, interest, and
issuance costs of bonds authorized by Section 63B-18-401 in the current fiscal
year to the appropriate debt service or sinking fund.
